Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Chapter 20 Wyoming Fair Practices Of Equipment Manufacturers, Distributors,Wholesalers And Dealers Act
§ 40-20-121.
Repurchase not required.

The provisions of this chapter shall not require the repurchase from a dealer of:

Any repair part in a broken or damaged package. The supplier shall be required to repurchase a repair part in a broken or damaged package, for a repurchase price that is equal to eighty-five percent (85%) of the current net price for the repair part, if the aggregate current net price for the entire package of repair parts is seventy-five dollars ($75.00) or higher;

Any repair part which because of its condition is not resalable as a new part without repackaging or reconditioning;

Any inventory the dealer is unable to furnish evidence, satisfactory to the supplier, of clear title, free and clear of all claims, liens and encumbrances;

Any inventory the dealer desires to keep, provided the dealer has a contractual right to do so;

Any equipment or repair parts not in new, unsold, undamaged or complete condition, subject to the provisions of this chapter relating to demonstrators;

Any equipment delivered to the dealer prior to the beginning of the thirty-six (36) month period immediately preceding the date of notification of termination;

Any equipment or repair parts ordered by the dealer on or after the date of notification of termination;

Any equipment or repair parts acquired by the dealer from any source other than the supplier unless the equipment or repair parts were ordered from or invoiced to the dealer by the supplier; or

Any equipment or repair parts not returned to the supplier within ninety (90) days after the later of:

The effective date of termination of a dealer agreement; and

The date the dealer receives from the supplier all information, documents or supporting materials required by the supplier to comply with the supplier’s return policy. This subparagraph shall not be applicable to a dealer if the supplier did not give the dealer notice of the ninety (90) day deadline at the time the applicable notice of termination was sent to the dealer.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 107, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2006, ch. 107, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2006.

§ 40-20-122.
Remedies and enforcement.

If the supplier violates any provision of this chapter, the dealer may bring an action against the supplier in a court of competent jurisdiction for damages sustained by the dealer as a consequence of the supplier’s violation, including, but not limited to, damages for lost profits, together with the actual costs of the action, including the attorney fees and costs of arbitrators. The dealer may also be granted injunctive relief against unlawful termination. The remedies set forth in this section shall not be deemed exclusive and shall be in addition to any other remedies permitted by law.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 107, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2006, ch. 107, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2006.

§ 40-20-123.
Choice of remedies; exemption from tax.

The provisions of this chapter shall be supplemental to any dealer agreement between the dealer and the supplier which provides the dealer with greater protection. The dealer can elect to pursue its contract remedy or the remedy provided by state law, or both. An election by the dealer to pursue these remedies shall not bar its right to exercise any other remedies that may be granted at law or in equity.

Any repurchase under this chapter is not subject to sales or use tax.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 107, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2006, ch. 107, § 1, makes the act effective July 1, 2006.